HunSpellDictionaries/lv_LV.dic
agrīns/WiYX
aizbāžamāks/+Wi
aizdzijušais/q+
aizgājušais/q+
aizknitušais/q+
aizkūrušais/+q
aizmetušais/q+
aizmūkošs/iW+
aizpļāvušais/q+
aizskrējušais/q+
aizspļāvušais/q+
aizvelkams/iX+W
aizvēmušais/+q
aizšķīrušais/q+
akcesors/Wi
aktuāls/WiYX+
alkatīgs/WiYX
analoģisks/Wi
anomāls/WiYX
apberamāks/W+i
apbrienams/W+XiO
apdzijušais/q+
apjautušais/q+
apkrimtušais/+q
apkrāpjamāks/Wi+
apkāvušais/q+
apmetušais/+q
appinams/X+Wi
appletušais/q+
applēšošs/iW+
aprāvušais/q+
apskāvušais/q+
apstūmušais/q+
aptuvens/WiYX
aptvērušais/q+
apātisks/WiXY
apķērušais/+q
artropātisks/Wi
astotais/q
astoņpadsmit/q
astronomisks/WiYX
atbļāvušais/+q
atdvešams/+WOi
atdzērušais/q+
atgājušais/+q
atkritušais/+q
atlējušais/+q
atpakaļejošs/Wi
atpļāvušais/q+
atriebīgs/WiYX
atsitušais/+q
atslējušais/q+
atstūmušais/q+
atsēžams/Wi+
atvēmušais/q+
atšāvušais/+q
atšķirīgs/WiYX+
augstražīgs/WiYX
aukstumizturīgs/Wi
autoritārs/WiYX
ačgārns/WiXY
balts/WiYX+
bargs/WiYX
baudkārīgs/WiYX
bezgaršīgs/WiYX
bezkaunīgs/WiYX
bikls/WiYX
bikonisks/Wi
blēdīgs/WiYX
brienošs/+Wi
brālīgs/WiXY
brīnišķīgs/WiYX
bārdains/WiYX
bērnišķīgs/WiYX
bļāvušais/q+
caurs/WiYX
ciets/WiYX
ciešs/WiYX
citoplazmatisks/Wi
cūcisks/WiYX
daudzkārtējs/Wi
daudzpieredzējušais/q
daudzvietīgs/WiYX
derdzīgs/WiYX
derīgs/WiYX+
desmits/Wi
deviņsimttūkstoš/q
diskutabls/WiYX+
divcollīgs/Wi
divsimt/q
diētisks/WiYX
drastisks/WiYX
draudošāks/i+W
draudzīgs/WiYX+
drūms/WiYX
dubļains/WiYX
dzestrs/WiYX
dzeņveidīgs/Wi
dzirdīgs/WiYX+
dēmonisks/WiYX
dīgtspējīgs/WiXY
eitektisks/Wi
eksakts/WiYX
eksplozīvs/WiYX
elektrometrisks/Wi
emocionāls/WiYX+
enerģisks/WiYX
errīgs/WiYX
fantastisks/WiYX
filigrāns/WiXY+
fizioloģisks/Wi
futūristisks/WiYX
gaisīgs/WiYX
gaišzils/WiXY
garkājains/WiYX
garāmgājušais/q+
garīgs/WiYX
gigantisks/WiYX
glezns/WiYX
glīzdens/WiXY
godbijīgs/WiYX+
godīgs/WiYX+
greizsirdīgs/WiYX
grozīgs/WiYX
grūtsirdīgs/WiYX
guļošs/Wi+
gādīgs/WiYX
higroskopisks/WiYX
hiperbolisks/Wi
hronisks/WiYX
iecietīgs/WiYX+
iecērtošs/W+i
iedevušais/q+
iegarens/WiYX
ieknitušais/q+
iekutētais/y
ielecamāks/+iW
ielijušais/q+
ieplešams/OX+Wi
iepriekšsagatavots/Wi
iepūtušais/q+
iespļāvušais/+q
ietinošs/W+i
iezīmīgs/WiYX
ieķērušais/+q
igaunisks/WiYX
imunohematoloģisks/Wi
individuāls/WiYX
industriāls/WiYX
inženiertehnisks/Wi
ironisks/WiYX+
iteratīvs/WiYX
izdevušais/+q
izjūtams/+XWi
izkritušais/q+
izmanīgs/WiYX+
izmijušais/+q
izotermisks/Wi
izrijušais/+q
izsmeļošs/WiYX+
izspļāvušais/q+
izsēžams/Wi+
izturīgs/WiYX+
izšāvušais/q+
jaunapgūts/Wi
jauneklīgs/WiYX
jauniņš/WXXO
jutīgs/WiYX+
jāvušais/+q
jūtīgs/WiYX+
kairs/WiYX
kardināls/WiYX
kareivīgs/WiYX
karstgalvīgs/WiYX
kaļams/+iWX
klajš/WiYXO
klājenisks/Wi
kokains/WiYX
kolosāls/WiYX
koncentrisks/WiYX
konkurētspējīgs/WiYX+
konspiratīvs/WiYX
kosmētisks/Wi
krampjains/WiYX
kraujš/WiYXO
kritušais/q+
krokains/WiYX
krunkains/WiYX
krējumains/Wi
kunkuļains/WiXY
kurls/WiYX
kvēlināmāks/i+W
kārpains/WiXY
kļūdains/WiXY
kūrušais/q+
labs/XWivY+
laidens/WiYX
latents/WiYX
latvisks/WiYX+
lekns/WiYX
lielgraudains/WiYX
lielvalstisks/WiXY
lielīgs/WiYX
lietišķīgs/WiXY
lipīgs/WiYX
lumbosakrāls/Wi
lustīgs/WiYX
lēnprātīgs/WiYX
līdzjūtīgs/WiYX
līkumains/WiXY
magnijsaturošs/Wi
maksātspējīgs/WiYX
mantīgs/WiYX
mazauglīgs/WiYX
mazisks/WiXY
mazizturīgs/WiYX
mazpienīgs/WiYX
mazsaturīgs/WiYX
meistarīgs/WiYX
melnbārdains/Wi
melns/WiYX
metilvioletais/q
mežains/WiYX
miermīlīgs/WiYX+
miglains/WiYX
minimāls/WiYX
mokpilns/WiYX
monofunkcionāls/Wi
mulss/WiYX
mutīgs/WiYX
mākoņains/WiYX
mānīgs/WiYX
mēms/WiYX
mīlīgs/WiYX+
nacionālistisks/WiYX
narkoloģisks/Wi
nazāls/WiYX
neatsīcams/OWi
nedaudzi/qo
neizkraukts/Wi
nelietīgs/WiYX
neparaukts/iW
nepārķērcams/WOi
niedrains/WiYX
nierveidīgs/Wi
nogrāvušais/q+
nogāzens/WiYX
nokrāvušais/+q
nokrītams/W+i
nomākts/WiYX
nopratušais/q+
noraidāmāks/Wi+
noskrējušais/+q
notvērušais/+q
notēšams/W+iO
novijams/WX+i
nozīmīgs/WiYX+
nožāvušais/q+
objektīvs/WiYX+
ogļskābs/WiYX
optimāls/WiYX+
ovāls/Wi
paciets/WiYX
padevušais/+q
pagļēvs/Wi
pajēls/WiYX
pakrimtušais/q+
palaidnīgs/WiYX
paliels/Wi
pamatkurināmais/q
pamitrs/WiYX
pamācošākais/y
paplešams/XOiW+
paplēšams/+iOW
paresns/WiYX
parijušais/q+
parādāmāks/+iW
pasauss/WiYX
paspļāvušais/+q
pasīks/WiYX
pasūtamāks/+iW
patmīlīgs/WiYX
patīkams/WYiX+
pavedams/+XiOW
pavītušais/q+
pazaļš/WiO
pašaurs/WiYX
pašmīlīgs/WiYX
paštaisīts/Wi
personisks/WiYX
piebrienošs/+Wi
piebļāvušais/q+
pieci/q
piecsimt/q
piekaltušais/+q
pieknūpošs/W+i
piekāvušais/+q
piemetams/+WXi
piemitušais/+q
piemīlīgs/WiYX+
pieplokošs/+Wi
pierējušais/+q
piestūmušais/q+
pietēšams/+OWi
pieļāvušais/q+
pikants/WiYX
pinkains/WiYX
piramīdveidīgs/Wi
pirotehnisks/WiYX
plikpaurains/WiYX
plutokrātisks/Wi
plēsīgs/WiYX
pornogrāfisks/Wi
posmains/WiYX
pratušais/q+
pretmagnētisks/Wi
priecīgs/WiYX
produktīvs/WiYX+
proģermānisks/Wi
prāvs/WiXY
pusduplekss/Wi
pārbrienams/W+XOi
pārdabisks/WiYX
pārdevušais/q+
pārgalvīgs/WiXY
pārknitušais/q+
pārkāšošs/Wi+
pārmijušais/+q
pārsienošs/W+i
pārsitušais/q+
pārsējušais/+q
pāršāvušais/+q
pēkšņs/WiYX
racionāls/WiYX+
rahītisks/Wi
raibs/WiXY
remdens/WiYX
revanšistisks/WiYX
reāls/WiYX+
rosinošāks/+iW
runātīgs/WiYX+
rūpīgs/WiYX
sabijušais/+q
sagrāvušais/+q
sakarīgs/WiYX+
sakrāvušais/q+
salejošs/W+i
samāvušais/q+
saprātīgs/WiYX+
sarains/WiYX
sarkanbaltizaļais/q
saskāvušais/q+
sastopamāks/+iW
sasāpētais/y
saviesīgs/WiYX
savijušais/q+
sažāvušais/+q
seksuāls/WiYX+
separātisks/Wi
septītais/q
seštūkstoš/q
sirdīgs/WiXY
skaists/WiYX+
skujams/W+i
slepens/WiYX+
slābans/WiYX
slējušais/+q
spaidīgs/WiYX
specifisks/WiYX+
spodrs/WiYX+
stabils/WiYX+
sterils/WiYX+
subarahnoidāls/Wi
sulīgs/WiYX
svaidīgs/WiYX
sēklains/WiXY
sīciņš/WXYO
taukains/WiYX
tiepīgs/WiYX
tiešs/WiYX+
timolzilais/q
transatlantisks/Wi
tropisks/WiYX
trāpīgs/WiYX
trīssimttūkstoš/q
tālākminēts/Wi
tītīgs/WiYX
tūļīgs/WiYX
uzbūrušais/+q
uzkaltušais/q+
uzlijušais/q+
uzmaļams/Wi+
uzsitušais/q+
uzstājīgs/WiYX+
uzsējušais/q+
uzticamākais/y
uzšķiļošs/+Wi
uzžāvušais/q+
vaislīgs/WiYX
veicīgs/WiYX
vesels/WiYX+
vienkārtīgs/Wi
viesmīlīgs/WiYX+
visaerobākais/y
visaizsargājamākais/y
visakūtākais/y
visanonīmākais/y
visapgrūtinošākais/y
visapķērīgākais/y
visastronomiskākais/y
visatpalikušākais/y
visaudzelīgākais/y
visaušīgākais/y
visbaltākais/y
visbezjēdzīgākais/y
visbijīgākais/y
visbrizantākais/y
visbālganākais/y
viscelmainākais/y
viscirkulārākais/y
visdaiļākais/y
visdekoratīvākais/y
visdievbijīgākais/y
visdiženākais/y
visdrausmīgākais/y
visdvēselīgākais/y
visdzīvotspējīgākais/y
visefektīvākais/y
viselegantākais/y
viseventuālākais/y
visfrivolākais/y
visgarlaicīgākais/y
visglīzdainākais/y
visgreizsirdīgākais/y
visgrūtākais/y
vishomogēnākais/y
visiekārojamākais/y
visietilpīgākais/y
visindividuālākais/y
visironiskākais/y
visizpirktākais/y
visizšķirošākais/y
visjutīgākais/y
viskankarainākais/y
viskaļķainākais/y
viskoloniālākais/y
viskonspektīvākais/y
viskrampjainākais/y
viskrunkainākais/y
viskuslākais/y
viskļūdainākais/y
vislaipnākais/y
visliberālākais/y
vislietišķākais/y
vislācīgākais/y
vislīdzīgākais/y
vismantkārīgākais/y
vismazkustīgākais/y
vismeistarīgākais/y
vismiesīgākais/y
vismokošākais/y
vismēmākais/y
visneakadēmiskākais/y
visnecaurlaidīgākais/y
visnegaidītākais/y
visneizskatīgākais/y
visnelabākais/y
visnenoturīgākais/y
visnepieejamākais/y
visnepārspīlētākais/y
visneskarbākais/y
visnetehniskākais/y
visnevienādākais/y
visnopietnākais/y
vispamanāmākais/y
vispašaizliedzīgākais/y
vispieredzējušākais/y
visplatoniskākais/y
vispretenciozākais/y
vispusīgākais/y
visracionālākais/y
visrespektablākais/y
visrūpīgākais/y
vissapratīgākais/y
vissazarotākais/y
vissistemātiskākais/y
vissliktākais/y
visspalvainākais/y
visspītīgākais/y
visstīgrākais/y
vissvītrainākais/y
vistaukākais/y
vistotalitārākais/y
vistvirtākais/y
visuvarenais/y
visvaraskārākais/y
visvieglprātīgākais/y
visvitālākais/y
visvīrišķīgākais/y
viszvērinātākais/y
visērkšķainākais/y
visķēnišķīgākais/y
visšādējādākais/y
visžākļainākais/y
vizuļains/WiYX
vēlīgs/WiYX
vērienīgs/WiYX
zaļš/WiXYO
zinīgs/WiYX+
ābolains/WiYX
ārējs/Wi
četrdesmittūkstoš/q
ēdelīgs/WiYX
īslaicīgs/WiYX
ķēmīgs/WiYX
ķēnišķīgs/WiYX
ļāvušais/q+
šausmīgs/WiYX
šķirisks/WiYX
žākļains/WiYX
